Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2097
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Required officers.

(1) A corporation shall have the officers described in its bylaws or appointed by the board of directors in accordance with the bylaws.

(2) A duly appointed officer may appoint one or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

(3) The bylaws or the board of directors shall delegate to one of the officers the responsibility for preparing minutes of the directors' and shareholders' meetings and for authenticating records of the corporation.

(4) The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in a corporation.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 97.

A receiver is an officer of the court and, thus, is subject to the control and powers specifically granted by the court and authorized by statute. A receiver is required to perform numerous tasks in satisfying his duty of care: Collecting, selling, distributing, and disposing of corporate assets. Inherent in the task of monitoring a corporate estate is the bringing and defending of pertinent lawsuits. Dickie v. Flamme Bros., 251 Neb. 910, 560 N.W.2d 762 (1997).